Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-229
Vagrants; pickpockets; other offenders; punishment.

A city of the first class by ordinance may provide for the punishment of vagrants, tramps or street beggars, prostitutes, disturbers of the peace, pickpockets, gamblers, burglars, thieves, and persons who practice any game, trick, or device with intent to swindle.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXXVI, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 4845;

C.S.1922, § 4013;

C.S.1929, § 16-230;

R.S.1943, § 16-229;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 32.